South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S962.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of Clemson University, relating to Honey Bees, designated as Regulation Document Number 5370, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The proposed changes and updates to Regulations 27-1 through 27-8 are based upon the need to provide greater efficiency within Clemson and to provide greater clarity to user groups and consumers. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on September 27, 2024. ----XX----